Massachusetts, session 194th, H3655.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 56 the following section:-
Section 56A. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Blue envelopes”, blue-colored envelopes designed either by the department of state
police or the registry of motor vehicles, in consultation with the department of state police, the
Massachusetts Chiefs of Police Association Incorporated and either Advocates for Autism of
Massachusetts or any other organization that advocates for persons with autism spectrum
disorder, that
of 2

(i) provide written information and guidance on the outside of the envelope regarding
ways to enhance effective communication between a police officer and a person with autism
spectrum disorder;
(ii) include instructions for ease of access to the envelope, including, but not limited to,
attaching the envelope to the sun visor on the driver’s side of the vehicle; and
(iii) can hold a person's motor vehicle operator's license, registration and insurance
identification card.
(b) The registrar of motor vehicles shall make available, upon request, said blue
envelopes to a person with autism spectrum disorder or the person's parent or guardian.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect as of July 1, 2026.
of 2